Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201181-1372
Act; supplementary to Industrial Relations Act.

The State Employees Collective Bargaining Act shall be deemed controlling for state employees and state employers covered
by such act and is supplementary to the Industrial Relations Act
except when otherwise specifically provided or when inconsistent with the
Industrial Relations Act, in which case the State Employees Collective Bargaining
Act shall prevail.

The State of Nebraska, its employees, employee organizations,
and exclusive collective-bargaining agents shall have all the rights and responsibilities
afforded employers, employees, employee organizations, and exclusive collective-bargaining
agents pursuant to the Industrial Relations Act to the extent that such act
is not inconsistent with the State Employees Collective Bargaining Act.

Laws 1987, LB 661, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB397, § 21.
October 1, 2011
Industrial Relations Act, see section 48-801.01.